apertium-es-cs.cs.dix
    <pardef n="p/éci__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>éci</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>éct</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>eču</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ečeš</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eče</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ečeme</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>ečem</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ečete</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ečou</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>ekl</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__četl"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ečen</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__chtěn"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ečení</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__úterý"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ekouc</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="dalš/í__BASE"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>ečíc</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="dalš/í__BASE"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ečen</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nov/ý"/></e>

      <e><p>          <l>eka</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eka</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ekouc</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ekouc</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ekouce</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ekouce</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ekouce</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>eče</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>eče</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>ečíc</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>ečíc</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>ečíce</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>ečíce</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>ečíce</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>eč</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ečme</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ečte</l><r>éci<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="my/slet__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>slet</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>slím</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>slíš</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>slí</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>slíme</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>slíte</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>slejí</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>          <l>slí</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>slel</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__četl"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>šlen</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__chtěn"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>šlení</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__úterý"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>slejíc</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="dalš/í__BASE"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>šlen</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nov/ý"/></e>

      <e><p>          <l>sleje</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sleje</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>slejíc</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>slejíc</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>slejíce</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>slejíce</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>slejíce</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>sli</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sleme</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>slete</l><r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>
